Washington statutes.
RCW 3.50.095

Municipal judge—Removal from office.

A municipal judge shall be removed only upon conviction of misconduct or malfeasance in office, or because of physical or mental disability rendering the judge incapable of performing the duties of the office.

[ 1984 c 258 s 124.]

NOTES:

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.

Application—1984 c 258 ss 101-139: See note following RCW 3.50.005.